Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 39. Joint Reapportionment Committee.

§ 30-263.
Joint Reapportionment Committee; membership; terms; quorum; compensation and expenses.

The Joint Reapportionment Committee (the Joint Committee) is established in the legislative branch of state government. The Joint Committee shall consist of five members of the Committee on Privileges and Elections of the House of Delegates and three members of the Committee on Privileges and Elections of the Senate appointed by the respective chairmen of the two committees. Members shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office.

The Joint Committee shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among its membership. A majority of the members of the Joint Committee shall constitute a quorum. The meetings of the Joint Committee shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request.

The Joint Committee shall supervise activities required for the tabulation of population for the census and for the timely reception of precinct population data for reapportionment.

Members shall receive such compensation as provided in § 30-19.12 and shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. Funding for the costs of compensation and expenses of the members shall be provided by the Office of the Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Office of Clerk of the Senate for their respective members.

History.

1986, c. 593, § 24.1-40.10; 1992, c. 425; 1993, c. 641, §

24.2-300

; 2004, c. 1000; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 56; 2022, , Sp. Sess. I, c. 1.

The numbers of §§ 30-263 through 30-265

were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the numbers in the 2004 act having been

30-248

through

30-250

.

Cross references.

As to legal service in certain redistricting proceedings, see §

2.2-508

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 56, cl. 10 provides: “That an emergency exists and the provisions of Enactment 9 of this act shall become effective on November 15, 2020, contingent upon the passage of an amendment to the Constitution of Virginia on the Tuesday after the first Monday in November 2020, establishing the Virginia Redistricting Commission by amending Section 6 of Article II and adding in Article II a new section numbered 6-A. If such amendment is not approved by the voters, the provisions of this act shall not become effective.”

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 56, cl. 9, effective November 15, 2020, in subsection A, inserted “(the Joint Committee)” in the first sentence and “Joint” in the second sentence; inserted “Joint” in the second and third sentences in subsection B; and deleted “and perform such other duties and responsibilities and exercise such supervision as may promote the orderly redistricting of congressional, state legislative, and local election districts” at the end of subsection C.

The 2022 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2022 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, cl. 9 amended this section without change.

§ 30-264.
Staff to Joint Reapportionment Committee.

The Division of Legislative Services shall serve as staff to the Joint Reapportionment Committee.

History.

1986, c. 593, § 24.1-40.11; 1991, 1st Sp. Sess., c. 10; 1992, c. 425, § 24.1-40.7:1; 1993, c. 641, § 24.2-301; 2004, c. 1000; 2019, cc. 777, 778; 2020, c. 862; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 56; 2022, , Sp. Sess. I, c. 1.

Editor’s note.

For Public Law 94-171, referred to above, see 13 U.S.C.S. § 141.

Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 56, cl. 10 provides: “That an emergency exists and the provisions of Enactment 9 of this act shall become effective on November 15, 2020, contingent upon the passage of an amendment to the Constitution of Virginia on the Tuesday after the first Monday in November 2020, establishing the Virginia Redistricting Commission by amending Section 6 of Article II and adding in Article II a new section numbered 6-A. If such amendment is not approved by the voters, the provisions of this act shall not become effective.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 777 and 778 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “(the Division)” and deleted “of Legislative Services” preceding “in the exchange”; and in subsection B, inserted “Geographic Information System (GIS)”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 862, in subsection C, deleted the first three sentences, which read: “The Division shall prepare and maintain a written description of the boundaries for the congressional, senatorial, and House of Delegates districts set out in Article 2 (§

24.2-302

et seq.) of Chapter 3 of Title 24.2. The descriptions shall identify each district boundary, insofar as practicable, by reference to political subdivision boundaries or to physical features such as named roads and streets. The Division shall furnish to each general registrar the descriptions for the districts dividing his county or city,” and in the remaining sentence, inserted “(§

24.2-302

et seq.) of Chapter 3 of Title 24.2” and substituted “in that article” for “in Article 2.”

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 56, cl. 9, effective November 15, 2020, rewrote the section.

The 2022 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2022 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, cl. 9 amended this section without change.

§ 30-265.
Reapportionment of congressional and state legislative districts; United States Census population counts.

For the purposes of redrawing the boundaries of the congressional, state Senate, and House of Delegates districts after the United States Census for the year 2020 and every 10 years thereafter, the Virginia Redistricting Commission established pursuant to Chapter 62 of Title 30 shall use the population data provided by the United States Bureau of the Census, as adjusted by the Division of Legislative Services pursuant to §

24.2-314

. The census data used for this apportionment purpose shall not include any population figure which is not allocated to specific census blocks within the Commonwealth, even though that population may have been included in the apportionment population figures of the Commonwealth for the purpose of allocating United States House of Representatives seats among the states.

History.

2000, c. 884, § 24.2-301.1; 2004, c. 1000; 2020, cc. 1229, 1265; 2020, c. 862; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 56; 2022, , Sp. Sess. I, c. 1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 56, cl. 10, provides: “That an emergency exists and the provisions of Enactment 9 of this act shall become effective on November 15, 2020, contingent upon the passage of an amendment to the Constitution of Virginia on the Tuesday after the first Monday in November 2020, establishing the Virginia Redistricting Commission by amending Section 6 of Article II and adding in Article II a new section numbered 6-A. If such amendment is not approved by the voters, the provisions of this act shall not become effective.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1229 and 1265 are identical, and substituted “2020” for “2000,” and “as adjusted by the Division of Legislative Services pursuant to §

24.2-314

. The” for “identical to those from the actual enumeration conducted by the Bureau for the apportionment of the Representatives of the United States House of Representatives following the United States decennial census, except that the.”

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 56, c. 9, effective November 15, 2020, substituted “Virginia Redistricting Commission established pursuant to Chapter 62 of Title 30” for “General Assembly” in the first sentence.

The 2022 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2022 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, cl. 9 amended this section without change.